Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-616
County; pounds; erection; keepers; compensation; rules and regulations.

A
county may provide for the erection of any pounds needed within the county,
appoint and compensate keepers thereof, and establish and enforce rules governing
such pounds.

Laws 1963, c. 104, § 3, p. 430;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 15.